Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4241.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 383B.041, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Economic interest disclosure; Three Rivers Park District. new text end new text begin A candidate for park district board of commissioners in Three Rivers Park District must file an original statement of economic interest with Hennepin County within 14 days of the end of the candidate filing period. An elected official in Three Rivers Park District must file the annual statement required in section 10A.09, subdivision 6, with Hennepin County for each year the individual remains in office. An original statement and annual statement must contain the information listed in section 10A.09, subdivision 5. The provisions of section 10A.09, subdivisions 6a, 7, and 9, apply to statements required by this subdivision. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 390.0065, is amended to read: 390.0065 HENNEPIN COUNTY MEDICAL EXAMINER; SELECTION AND TERM. Hennepin County shall use the following procedure to select the Hennepin County medical examiner: the Hennepin County Board shall designate three deleted text begin licensed physiciansdeleted text end new text begin individualsnew text end who shall constitute a Medical Examiner Board. One member shall be a deleted text begin dean or professor of the Department of Pathology of a Class A medical school as designated by the American Medical Association. Anotherdeleted text end new text begin professor of pathology in the Department of Laboratory Medicine and Pathology at the University of Minnesota. The secondnew text end member of the board shall be a deleted text begin member of the Minnesota Society of Pathologistsdeleted text end new text begin pathologist practicing at Hennepin Healthcarenew text end . The third member shall be deleted text begin designated by the Hennepin County Medical Association from its membershipdeleted text end new text begin the director of medical examiner operations at the Hennepin County Medical Examiner's Officenew text end . The Medical Examiner Board shall accept applications for the position of Hennepin County medical examiner when a vacancy exists in the office. Applications deleted text begin thereforedeleted text end shall be considered from doctors of medicine who are: (1) graduates of a medical school recognized by the American Medical Association or American Osteopathic Associationdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2) members in good standing in the medical professiondeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (3) eligible for deleted text begin appointment to the staff of the Hennepin County Medical Center,deleted text end new text begin a license to practice medicine in Minnesota;new text end and (4) deleted text begin certified or eligible for certificationdeleted text end new text begin board-certifiednew text end in forensic pathology by the American Board of Pathology. The Medical Examiner Board shall review the qualifications of the applicants deleted text begin and shalldeleted text end new text begin ,new text end rank the applicants deemed qualified for the positionnew text begin ,new text end and provide to the county board a report of the deleted text begin seven highest rankeddeleted text end applicants together with their qualifications. The county board shall appoint a county medical examiner from those listed in the report. The term of the examiner shall continue for four years from the date of appointment. Reappointment shall be made at least 90 days prior to the expiration of the term. If a vacancy requires a temporary appointment, the board of commissioners shall appoint a medical doctor on the staff of the county medical examiner's office to assume the duties of the medical examiner until an appointment can be made in compliance with the specified selection procedure. Actual and necessary expenses of the Medical Examiner Board shall be paid in accordance with sections 471.38 to 471.415. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 1969, chapter 193, section 3, as amended by Laws 1974, chapter 235, section 1, and Laws 1980, chapter 371, section 1, is amended to read: Sec. 3. INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT NO. 535; ELECTIONS. deleted text begin Election districts may at any time be established in the manner provided by this act or the board of education of the district may by resolution at any time provide that the board members be elected at large. If the members are elected at large the notice of election should include substantially the following form: deleted text end deleted text begin "Position number 3 and Position number 5 are to be filled by election. Candidates may not file for more than one position." deleted text end deleted text begin If the members are elected at large the ballots shall read as follows: deleted text end deleted text begin "For school board position number 3 of Independent School District Number 535" or "For school board position number 5 of Independent School District Number 535." deleted text end deleted text begin The names of the candidates for each seat shall be rotated on the ballots to avoid any appearance of preference for incumbents, and incumbency shall not be indicated on the ballot. deleted text end deleted text begin Newly elected school board members shall take office at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board following receipt of their certificates of election and notwithstanding section 123.34, subdivision 1, the board may organize at that meeting rather than at the time required by section 123.34, subdivision 1. If the school district changes from election by district to election at large or from election at large to election by district incumbents shall serve the entire terms to which they were elected under the prior system. If the school district changes from election by district to election at large incumbents shall be assigned by lot to the numbered positions. deleted text end new text begin School board elections for Independent School District No. 535, Rochester, shall be conducted in accordance with Minnesota Statutes, chapter 205A. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 205A.12, the district may alter its organization into separate election districts for the purpose of election of board members using the procedures provided in that section. School board membership shall be governed by Minnesota Statutes, section 123B.09. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin SPECIAL LAW.new text end new text begin Section 3 is a special law enacted pursuant to the Minnesota Constitution, article XII, section 2, and applies to Independent School District No. 535, Rochester. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Section 3 is effective upon approval by the governing body of Independent School District No. 535 and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3, for school district elections held after completion of local approval. The local approval process must be completed by June 30, 2026, to apply to 2026 school district elections. new text end